test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-hepemn26_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hepeḿ: # Noun (25) hepeḿ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Nom: hepeḿ
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Gen: hebeme
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Par: hebend
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ill: hepemehe
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ine: süämen
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ela: süämest
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+All: süämele
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ade: süämel
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Abl: süämelt
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Tra: süämes
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ter: süämeniq
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Abe: süämeldäq
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Com: süämegaq
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Nom: süämeq
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Gen: [süämide, süämiide]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Par: [süämit, süämiid]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ill: [süämihe, süämiihe, süändehe, süämide, süämiide, süändede]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ine: süämin
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ela: [süämist, süämiist, süändest]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+All: [süämile, süämiile, süändele]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ade: [süämil, süämiil, süändel]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Abl: [süämilt, süämiilt, süändelt]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Tra: [süämis, süämiis, süändes]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ter: [süäminiq, süämiiniq, süändeniq]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Abe: [süämildäq, süämiildäq, süändeldäq]
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Com: [süämidegaq, süämiidegaq, süändegaq]
